src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_cegattid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: # MLO, checked

  Verb - cegâttiđ: #: MLO, checked
    cegâttiđ+V+Inf: cegâttiđ
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cegâttâm
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cegâttah
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceeggât # from dict
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cegâtteen
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ceeggâtvettee
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cegâttává
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cegâttep
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ceeggâtvetteđ
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cegâtteh
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cegâttim
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cegâttih
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cegâttij
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: cegâttáim
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: cegâttáid
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: cegâttáin
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cegâttijm
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cegâttijd
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cegâttii
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: cegâttiččim
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: cegâttiččih
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: cegâttičij
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: cegâttiččijm
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: cegâttiččijd
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: cegâttiččijn
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: cegâttiččijm
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: cegâttiččijd
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: cegâttiččii
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: cegâttižžeem
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: cegâttižžeeh
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: cegâttiš
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: cegâttižžeen
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: cegâttišvettee
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: cegâttižává
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: cegâttižžep
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: cegâttišvetteđ
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: cegâttižeh
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceeggât
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: cegâttus
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: cegâttoon
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: cegâttee
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: cegâttus
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: cegâttop
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: cegâttiđ
    cegâttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: cegâttus
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceeggât
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cegâttâm
    cegâttiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: cegâttiččii
    cegâttiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: cegâttižžii
    cegâttiđ+V+PrsPrc: [cegâtteijee, cegâttijjee]
    cegâttiđ+V+PrfPrc: cegâttâm
    cegâttiđ+V+Actio+Nom: cegâttem
    cegâttiđ+V+Actio+Ess: ceeggâtmin
    cegâttiđ+V+Actio+Loc: ceeggâtmist
    cegâttiđ+V+Actio+Ill: ceeggâtmân
    cegâttiđ+V+Ger: ceeggâtdijn
    cegâttiđ+V+VAbess: ceeggâthánnáá
    
